Montana, session 2025, SB419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 19-3-521, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-3-521. Service credit for legislative members. (1) A Beginning the date a member of the
legislature of Montana assumes office, the member must receive membership service and service credit for that
the portion of each year for which the member pays regular contributions.
(2) When calculating the service retirement benefit for a member of the legislature, the plan
provisions that are applied must be those applicable to the earliest period for which the member paid required
contributions or purchased service credit in accordance with the provisions of Title 19, chapter 2, part 7, but no
earlier than the date the member assumed office, unless the member has prior nonlegislative, covered
employment."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 419